Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB995.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7715. Emergency preparedness for owned animals.(a) Declaration of purpose.--The purpose of this section is to establish and maintain a Statewide disaster plan and response capability for owned animals affected by disasters.(b) Authority.--The agency shall:(1) Administer the provisions of this section.(2) Allocate money in accordance with this section.(3) Include in the Commonwealth Emergency Management Plan provisions for the protection of owned animals in this Commonwealth in disasters.123456789101112131415161718 (c) Eligible disaster funding.--The agency shall provide funding on an annual basis to an animal response team approved by the agency for planning, developing and maintaining animal response and rescue capabilities consistent with standards and guidelines established by the agency.(d) Recordkeeping and audit.--The agency shall require an animal response team receiving money under this section to retain and provide, upon request, records that the agency believes are necessary to ensure that money is spent in accordance with this section.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." The Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency."Owned animals." The term shall include any animal kept as a pet, agricultural commodity or pursuant to a permit issued by the Pennsylvania Game Commission. The term shall not include wildlife.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0995PN1084 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819